Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 3 Contested Cases
4-5-315. Review of initial order.

The agency upon the agency's motion may, and where provided by federal law or upon appeal by any party shall, review an initial order, except to the extent that:

A statute or rule of the agency precludes or limits agency review of the initial order; or

The agency in the exercise of discretion conferred by statute or rule of the agency:

Determines to review some but not all issues, or not to exercise any review;

Delegates its authority to review the initial order to one (1) or more persons; or

Authorizes one (1) or more persons to review the initial order, subject to further review by the agency.

A petition for appeal from an initial order shall be filed with the agency, or with any person designated for such purpose by rule of the agency, within fifteen (15) days after entry of the initial order. If the agency on its own motion decides to review an initial order, the agency shall give written notice of its intention to review the initial order within fifteen (15) days after its entry. The fifteen-day period for a party to file a petition for appeal or for the agency to give notice of its intention to review an initial order on the agency's own motion shall be tolled by the submission of a timely petition for reconsideration of the initial order pursuant to § 4-5-317, and a new fifteen-day period shall start to run upon disposition of the petition for reconsideration. If an initial order is subject both to a timely petition for reconsideration and to a petition for appeal or to review by the agency on its own motion, the petition for reconsideration shall be disposed of first, unless the agency determines that action on the petition for reconsideration has been unreasonably delayed.

The petition for appeal shall state its basis. If the agency on its own motion gives notice of its intent to review an initial order, the agency shall identify the issues that it intends to review.

The person reviewing an initial order shall exercise all the decision-making power that the agency would have had to render a final order had the agency presided over the hearing, except to the extent that the issues subject to review are limited by rule or statute or by the agency upon notice to all parties.

The agency shall afford each party an opportunity to present briefs and may afford each party an opportunity to present oral argument.

Before rendering a final order, the agency may cause a transcript to be prepared, at the agency's expense, of such portions of the proceeding under review as the agency considers necessary.

The agency may render a final order disposing of the proceeding or may remand the matter for further proceedings with instructions to the person who rendered the initial order. Upon remanding a matter, the agency may order such temporary relief as is authorized and appropriate.

A final order or an order remanding the matter for further proceedings pursuant to this section shall be rendered and entered in writing within sixty (60) days after receipt of briefs and oral argument, unless that period is waived or extended with the written consent of all parties or for good cause shown.

A final order or an order remanding the matter for further proceedings under this section shall identify any difference between such order and the initial order, and shall include, or incorporate by express reference to the initial order, all the matters required by § 4-5-314(c).

The agency shall cause copies of the final order or order remanding the matter for further proceedings to be delivered to each party and to the administrative judge or hearing officer who conducted the contested case.

Acts 1982, ch. 874, § 55; 2000, ch. 594, §§ 1, 2.

Law Reviews.

Symposium – Memphis in The Law: The Process of Determining What Process is Due: The Continuing Saga of Memphis Light, Gas & Water Division v. Craft, 436 U.S. 1 (1978) (Donna Harkness), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 745 (2011).

Attorney General Opinions. If a contested case is heard by an administrative judge or hearing officer appointed by the commissioner of revenue under the authority of T.C.A. §67-1-105(b)(2), the conduct of the contested case is governed by the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act applicable to proceedings conducted by an administrative judge or hearing officer sitting alone; in those cases, the hearing officer is required to issue an initial order, which is reviewable by the commissioner, OAG 02-071, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 76 (5/29/02).

4-5-316. Stay.

A party may submit to the agency a petition for stay of effectiveness of an initial or final order within seven (7) days after its entry unless otherwise provided by statute or stated in the initial or final order. The agency may take action on the petition for stay, either before or after the effective date of the initial or final order.

Acts 1982, ch. 874, § 56.

Law Reviews.

Symposium – Memphis in The Law: The Process of Determining What Process is Due: The Continuing Saga of Memphis Light, Gas & Water Division v. Craft, 436 U.S. 1 (1978) (Donna Harkness), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 745 (2011).

4-5-317. Reconsideration.

Any party, within fifteen (15) days after entry of an initial or final order, may file a petition for reconsideration, stating the specific grounds upon which relief is requested. However, the filing of the petition shall not be a prerequisite for seeking administrative or judicial review.

The petition shall be disposed of by the same person or persons who rendered the initial or final order, if available.

The person or persons who rendered the initial or final order that is the subject of the petition, shall, within twenty (20) days of receiving the petition, enter a written order either denying the petition, granting the petition and setting the matter for further proceedings; or granting the petition and issuing a new order, initial or final, in accordance with § 4-5-314. If no action has been taken on the petition within twenty (20) days, the petition shall be deemed to have been denied.

An order granting the petition and setting the matter for further proceedings shall state the extent and scope of the proceedings, which shall be limited to argument upon the existing record, and no new evidence shall be introduced unless the party proposing such evidence shows good cause for such party's failure to introduce the evidence in the original proceeding.

The sixty-day period for a party to file a petition for review of a final order shall be tolled by granting the petition and setting the matter for further proceedings, and a new sixty-day period shall start to run upon disposition of the petition for reconsideration by issuance of a final order by the agency.

Acts 1982, ch. 874, § 58; 2000, ch. 594, § 3.

Cross-References. Petition for judicial review, time for filing not extended by time allotted for filing petition for reconsideration, §4-5-322.

Law Reviews.

Symposium – Memphis in The Law: The Process of Determining What Process is Due: The Continuing Saga of Memphis Light, Gas & Water Division v. Craft, 436 U.S. 1 (1978) (Donna Harkness), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 745 (2011).

4-5-318. Effectiveness of new order.

Unless a later date is stated in an initial or final order, or a stay is granted, an initial or final order shall become effective upon entry of the initial or final order. All initial and final orders shall state when the order is entered and effective.

If the agency has utilized an administrative judge from the administrative procedures division of the office of the secretary of state, the initial or final order shall not be deemed entered until the initial or final order has been filed with the administrative procedures division.

The agency shall establish which agency members, officials or employees may sign final orders rendered by the agency.

A party may not be required to comply with a final order unless the final order has been mailed to the last known address of the party or unless the party has actual knowledge of the final order.

A nonparty may not be required to comply with a final order unless the agency has made the final order available for public inspection and copying or unless the nonparty has actual knowledge of the final order.

Unless a later date is stated in an initial order or a stay is granted, the time when an initial order becomes a final order in accordance with § 4-5-314 shall be as follows:

When the initial order is entered, if administrative review is unavailable;

When the agency enters an order stating, after a petition for appeal has been filed, that review will not be exercised, if discretion is available to make a determination to this effect; or

Fifteen (15) days after entry of the initial order, if no party has filed a petition for appeal and the agency has not given written notice of its intention to exercise review.

An initial order that becomes a final order in accordance with subsection (f) and § 4-5-314 shall be effective upon becoming a final order; provided, that:

A party may not be required to comply with the final order unless the party has been served with or has actual knowledge of the initial order or of an order stating that review will not be exercised; and

A nonparty may not be required to comply with the final order unless the agency has made the initial order available for public inspection and copying or the nonparty has actual knowledge of the initial order or of an order stating that review will not be exercised.

This section shall not preclude an agency from taking immediate action to protect the public interest in accordance with § 4-5-320.

Acts 1982, ch. 874, § 59; 2001, ch. 304, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Symposium – Memphis in The Law: The Process of Determining What Process is Due: The Continuing Saga of Memphis Light, Gas & Water Division v. Craft, 436 U.S. 1 (1978) (Donna Harkness), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 745 (2011).

4-5-319. Agency record.

An agency shall maintain an official record of each contested case under this chapter. The record shall be maintained for a period of time not less than three (3) years; provided, that the department of labor and workforce development shall be required to maintain the record for such period of time as shall be determined by the agency or otherwise required by law.

The agency record shall consist solely of:

Notice of all proceedings;

Any prehearing order;

Any motions, pleadings, briefs, petitions, requests and intermediate rulings;

Evidence received or considered;

A statement of matters officially noticed;

Proffers of proof and objections and rulings thereon;

Proposed findings, requested orders, and exceptions;

The tape recording, stenographic notes or symbols, or transcript of the hearing;

Any final order, initial order, or order on reconsideration;

Staff memoranda or data submitted to the agency unless prepared and submitted by personal assistants and not inconsistent with § 4-5-304(b); and

Matters placed on the record after an ex parte communication.

A record, which may consist of a tape or similar electronic recording, shall be made of all oral proceedings. Such record or any part thereof shall be transcribed on request of any party at such party's expense or may be transcribed by the agency at its expense. If the agency elects to transcribe the proceedings, any party shall be provided copies of the transcript upon payment to the agency of a reasonable compensatory fee.

Except to the extent that this chapter or another statute provides otherwise, the agency record shall constitute the exclusive basis for agency action in adjudicative proceedings under this chapter, and for judicial review thereof.

Acts 1974, ch. 725, § 8; 1975, ch. 370, §§ 3, 12; 1978, ch. 938, §§ 4, 5; T.C.A., §§ 4-514, 4-5-108(g); Acts 1982, ch. 874, § 60; 1999, ch. 520, § 27; 2011, ch. 82, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Symposium – Memphis in The Law: The Process of Determining What Process is Due: The Continuing Saga of Memphis Light, Gas & Water Division v. Craft, 436 U.S. 1 (1978) (Donna Harkness), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 745 (2011).

Embracing Our Public Purpose: A Value-Based Lawyer-Licensing Model, 48 U. Mem. L. Rev. 351 (2017).

4-5-320. Proceedings affecting licenses.

When the grant, denial, or renewal of a license is required to be preceded by notice and opportunity for hearing, the provisions of this chapter concerning contested cases apply.

When a licensee has made timely and sufficient application for the renewal of a license or a new license with reference to any activity of a continuing nature, the existing license does not expire until the application has been finally determined by the agency, and, in case the application is denied or the terms of the new license limited, until the last day for seeking review of the agency order or a later date fixed by order of the reviewing court.

No revocation, suspension, or withdrawal of any license is lawful unless, prior to the institution of agency proceedings, the agency gave notice by mail to the licensee of facts or conduct that warrant the intended action, and the licensee was given an opportunity to show compliance with all lawful requirements for the retention of the license. If the agency finds that public health, safety, or welfare imperatively requires emergency action, and incorporates a finding to that effect in its order, summary action, including suspension of a license or other licensure restriction or action as may be appropriate to protect the public, may be ordered pending proceedings for revocation or other action. These proceedings shall be promptly instituted and determined.

Notwithstanding subsection (c), in issuing an order of summary action against a license the agency shall use one (1) of the following procedures:

The agency shall issue a notice to the licensee providing an opportunity for a prompt informal hearing, review or conference before the agency prior to the issuance of an order of summary action; or

The agency shall proceed with the summary action and notify the licensee of the opportunity for an informal hearing, review or conference before the agency within seven (7) business days of the issuance of the order of summary action.

The notice provided to the licensee may be provided by any reasonable means and shall inform the licensee of the reasons for the action or intended action of the agency and of the opportunity for an informal hearing, review or conference before the agency. The informal hearing, review or conference described by this subsection (d) shall not be required to be held under the contested case provisions of this chapter. The hearing, review or conference is intended to provide an informal, reasonable opportunity for the licensee to present the licensee's version of the situation to the person or entity authorized by law to take the summary action against the license involved. Whether the informal hearing, review or conference is held before or after an order of summary action, the sole issue to be considered is whether the public health, safety or welfare imperatively required emergency action by the agency.

Acts 1974, ch. 725, § 16; T.C.A., §§ 4-522, 4-5-116; Acts 1982, ch. 874, § 61; 1993, ch. 458, § 2; 2020, ch. 594, §§ 1-4.

Law Reviews.

Business License Revocation: Is This What Tennessee Needs? (Linda Rose and Rose Paxtor), 44 Tenn. B.J. 23 (2008).

Symposium – Memphis in The Law: The Process of Determining What Process is Due: The Continuing Saga of Memphis Light, Gas & Water Division v. Craft, 436 U.S. 1 (1978) (Donna Harkness), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 745 (2011).

Attorney General Opinions. Statute of limitations regarding physician discipline. OAG 11-43, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 45 (5/11/11).

4-5-321. Administrative procedures division — Manual of policies and procedures — Code of conduct.

There is created in the office of the secretary of state a division to be known as the administrative procedures division. This division has the responsibility to:

Investigate any conflicts or inequities that may develop between federal administrative procedures, and state administrative procedures and propose any amendments to this chapter to correct those inconsistencies and inequities as they develop;

Establish and maintain in cooperation with the office of the attorney general and reporter a pool of administrative judges and hearing officers, who shall be learned in the law;

Establish and maintain in cooperation with the office of the attorney general and reporter a pool of court reporters for agency administrative hearing proceedings before the licensing boards that are under the supervision of the departments of commerce and insurance and of health; and

Perform any and all other functions assigned to the secretary of state under this chapter and delegated by the secretary of state to the administrative procedures division.

The secretary of state shall adopt by rule, promulgated in accordance with the rulemaking requirements of this chapter, a manual of policies and procedures, including a code of conduct, to be followed by all administrative judges and hearing officers.

Acts 1974, ch. 725, § 21; 1975, ch. 370, § 17; 1978, ch. 938, § 16; 1979, ch. 371, § 2; T.C.A., §§ 4-527, 4-5-121(a); Acts 1982, ch. 874, § 62; 1984, ch. 728, § 12; 1986, ch. 738, § 4.

Law Reviews.

Symposium – Memphis in The Law: The Process of Determining What Process is Due: The Continuing Saga of Memphis Light, Gas & Water Division v. Craft, 436 U.S. 1 (1978) (Donna Harkness), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 745 (2011).

4-5-322. Judicial review.

A person who is aggrieved by a final decision in a contested case is entitled to judicial review under this chapter, which shall be the only available method of judicial review. A preliminary, procedural or intermediate agency action or ruling is immediately reviewable if review of the final agency decision would not provide an adequate remedy.

A state agency is considered to be an aggrieved person for the purpose of judicial review when the order is from a board, commission or other entity independent of the aggrieved agency. In such instances, judicial review under this chapter is permitted upon the request of the agency head and the approval of the attorney general and reporter.

Proceedings for review are instituted by filing a petition for review in chancery court.

Except as provided in subdivisions (b)(1)(B), venue for appeals of contested case hearings shall be in the chancery court nearest to the place of residence of the person contesting the agency action or alternatively, at the person's discretion, in the chancery court nearest to the place where the cause of action arose, or in the chancery court of Davidson County.

Venue for appeals of contested case hearings involving TennCare determinations shall be in the chancery court of Davidson County.

Petitions seeking judicial review shall be filed within sixty (60) days after the entry of the agency's final order thereon.

A person who is aggrieved by a final decision of the department of human services or the department of children's services in a contested case may file a petition for review in the chancery court located either in the county of the official residence of the appropriate commissioner or in the county in which any one (1) or more of the petitioners reside.

A person who is aggrieved by the final determination of a hearing officer or local board of education in a special education hearing conducted pursuant to § 49-10-606 may file a petition for review in the chancery court of Davidson County or, alternatively, in the county in which the petitioner resides.

A person who is aggrieved by any final decision of the Tennessee public utility commission, or by a final decision of the state board of equalization in a contested case involving centrally assessed utility property assessed in accordance with title 67, chapter 5, part 13, shall file any petition for review with the middle division of the court of appeals.

In a case in which a petition for judicial review is submitted within the sixty-day period but is filed with an inappropriate court, the case shall be transferred to the appropriate court. The time for filing a petition for review in a court as provided in this chapter shall not be extended because of the period of time allotted for filing with the agency a petition for reconsideration. Copies of the petition shall be served upon the agency and all parties of record, including the attorney general and reporter, in accordance with the provisions of the Tennessee Rules of Civil Procedure pertaining to service of process.

The filing of the petition for review does not itself stay enforcement of the agency decision. The agency may grant, or the reviewing court may order, a stay upon appropriate terms, but if it is shown to the satisfaction of the reviewing court, in a hearing that shall be held within ten (10) days of a request for hearing by either party, that any party or the public at large may suffer injury by reason of the granting of a stay, then no stay shall be granted until a good and sufficient bond, in an amount fixed and approved by the court, shall be given by the petitioner conditioned to indemnify the other persons who might be so injured and if no bond amount is sufficient, the stay shall be denied. The reviewing court shall not consider a stay unless notice has been given to the attorney general and reporter; nor shall the reviewing court consider a stay unless the petitioner has previously sought a stay from the agency or demonstrates that an agency ruling on a stay application cannot be obtained within a reasonable time.

Within forty-five (45) days after service of the petition, or within further time allowed by the court, the agency shall transmit to the reviewing court the original or a certified copy of the entire record of the proceeding under review. By stipulation of all the parties of the review proceedings, the record may be shortened. A party unreasonably refusing to stipulate to limit the record may be taxed by the court for the additional cost. The court may require or permit subsequent corrections or additions to the record.

If, before the date set for hearing, application is made to the court for leave to present additional evidence, and it is shown to the satisfaction of the court that the additional evidence is material and that there were good reasons for failure to present it in the proceeding before the agency, the court may order that the additional evidence be taken before the agency upon conditions determined by the court. The agency may modify its findings and decision by reason of the additional evidence and shall file that evidence and any modifications, new findings or decisions with the reviewing court.

The procedure ordinarily followed in the reviewing court will be followed in the review of contested cases decided by the agency, except as otherwise provided in this chapter. The agency that issued the decision to be reviewed is not required to file a responsive pleading.

The review shall be conducted by the court without a jury and shall be confined to the record. In cases of alleged irregularities in procedure before the agency, not shown in the record, proof thereon may be taken in the court.

The court may affirm the decision of the agency or remand the case for further proceedings. The court may reverse or modify the decision if the rights of the petitioner have been prejudiced because the administrative findings, inferences, conclusions or decisions are:

In violation of constitutional or statutory provisions;

In excess of the statutory authority of the agency;

Made upon unlawful procedure;

Arbitrary or capricious or characterized by abuse of discretion or clearly unwarranted exercise of discretion; or

Unsupported by evidence that is both substantial and material in the light of the entire record;

In determining the substantiality of evidence, the court shall take into account whatever in the record fairly detracts from its weight, but the court shall not substitute its judgment for that of the agency as to the weight of the evidence on questions of fact.

No agency decision pursuant to a hearing in a contested case shall be reversed, remanded or modified by the reviewing court unless for errors that affect the merits of such decision.

The reviewing court shall reduce its findings of fact and conclusions of law to writing and make them parts of the record.

Acts 1974, ch. 725, § 17; 1975, ch. 370, § 6; 1978, ch. 815, § 1; 1978, ch. 938, § 13; T.C.A., § 4-523; Acts 1980, ch. 478, § 1; T.C.A., §4-5-117; Acts 1982, ch. 874, § 63; 1986, ch. 738, § 2; 1995, ch. 305, § 68; 2002, ch. 610, § 1; 2017, ch. 94, § 3; 2018, ch. 1021, § 1; 2019, ch. 107, § 44.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2002, ch. 610, § 2 provided that the 2002 amendment shall apply to any petition for judicial review filed on or after July 1, 2002.

Cross-References. Petition for judicial review, 60-day period for filing tolled by granting petition for reconsideration, §4-5-317.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in the text and Advisory Commission Comments of Rule 12 of the Tennessee Rules of Appellate Procedure.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 976.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 1-8-17, 1-8-17A, 2-12-1.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Administrative Law, §§ 2, 3; 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 268; 4 Tenn. Juris., Automobiles, § 31; 5 Tenn. Juris., Carriers, § 58; 21 Tenn. Juris., Public Utility Commission, §§ 2, 3, 5; 23 Tenn. Juris., Taxation, § 42.

Law Reviews.

Bid Protests in Tennessee (Steven W. Feldman), 34 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 27 (1998).

Symposium – Memphis in The Law: The Process of Determining What Process is Due: The Continuing Saga of Memphis Light, Gas & Water Division v. Craft, 436 U.S. 1 (1978) (Donna Harkness), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 745 (2011).

The Proper Scope of Nonlawyer Representation in State Administrative Proceedings: A State Specific Balancing Approach, 43 Vand. L. Rev. 245 (1990).

4-5-323. Appeals to court of appeals.

An aggrieved party may obtain a review of any final judgment of the chancery court under this chapter by appeal to the court of appeals of Tennessee.

The record certified to the chancery court and the record in the chancery court shall constitute the record in an appeal. Evidence taken in court pursuant to § 4-5-322(g) shall become a part of the record.

The procedure on appeal shall be governed by the Tennessee Rules of Appellate Procedure.

Acts 1974, ch. 725, § 18; 1977, ch. 298, § 1; T.C.A., § 4-524; Acts 1981, ch. 449, § 2; T.C.A., §4-5-118; Acts 1982, ch. 874, § 64.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 268; 5 Tenn. Juris., Carriers, § 58; 21 Tenn. Juris., Public Utility Commission, § 3.

Law Reviews.

Symposium – Memphis in The Law: The Process of Determining What Process is Due: The Continuing Saga of Memphis Light, Gas & Water Division v. Craft, 436 U.S. 1 (1978) (Donna Harkness), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 745 (2011).

4-5-324. Training program for administrative judges or hearing officers.

Each person employed to serve as an administrative judge or hearing officer within the executive branch shall, within the six-month period following the date of such employment, participate in a program of training for administrative judges and hearing officers conducted by the department of human resources, division of training. The department shall issue a certificate of participation to each judge or officer whose attendance is satisfactory.

An administrative judge or hearing officer who hears contested cases referred to the office of the secretary of state by a public institution of postsecondary or higher education involving allegations of sexual assault, dating violence, domestic violence, or stalking shall annually participate in training that satisfies the requirements of Title IX of the Education Amendments of 1972 (20 U.S.C. § 1681), the Jeanne Clery Disclosure of Campus Security Policy and Campus Crime Statistics Act (20 U.S.C. § 1092(f)), and the federal regulations implementing those statutes, as amended.

Acts 1986, ch. 738, § 4; 2007, ch. 60, § 3; 2017, ch. 134, § 1; 2018, ch. 980, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2007, ch. 60, § 3 provided that the references to the department of personnel are changed to the department of human resources, effective April 24, 2007.

Acts 2018, ch. 980, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Student Due Process Protection Act.”

Acts 2018, ch. 980, § 14 provided that public institutions of higher education may implement this part by promulgating emergency rules pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2018, ch. 980, § 15 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to all contested cases that are requested on or after July 1, 2018.

Law Reviews.

Symposium – Memphis in The Law: The Process of Determining What Process is Due: The Continuing Saga of Memphis Light, Gas & Water Division v. Craft, 436 U.S. 1 (1978) (Donna Harkness), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 745 (2011).

4-5-325. Payment of costs to cited party.

When a state agency issues a citation to a person, local governmental entity, board or commission for the violation of a rule, regulation or statute and such citation results in a contested case hearing, at the conclusion of such hearing, the hearing officer or administrative law judge may order such agency to pay to the party issued a citation the amount of reasonable expenses incurred because of such citation, including a reasonable attorney's fee, if such officer or judge finds that the citation was issued:

Even though, to the best of such agency's knowledge, information and belief formed after reasonable inquiry, the violation was not well grounded in fact and was not warranted by existing law, rule or regulation; or

For an improper purpose such as to harass, to cause unnecessary delay or cause needless expense to the party cited.

If a final decision in a contested case hearing results in the party issued a citation seeking judicial review pursuant to § 4-5-322, the judge, at the conclusion of the hearing, may make the same findings and enter the same order as permitted the hearing officer or administrative law judge pursuant to subsection (a).

Acts 1994, ch. 869, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1994, ch. 869, § 2 provided that this section applies to any applicable citations issued on or after July 1, 1994.

Law Reviews.

Symposium – Memphis in The Law: The Process of Determining What Process is Due: The Continuing Saga of Memphis Light, Gas & Water Division v. Craft, 436 U.S. 1 (1978) (Donna Harkness), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 745 (2011).